California statutes. Education Code
-------------------------------------------

66071.

In enacting this article, it is the intent of the Legislature to urge the continued development and implementation of assessment processes whereby institutions of higher education establish mechanisms, through program review and improvement, for the assessment of their performance in attempting to improve student learning and comprehension and achieving the expressed state policy goals for higher education of quality, educational equity, employee diversity, student transfer, and student retention. The primary purposes of assessment shall be to improve teaching and learning as well as academic advising. Assessment programs shall be focused on activities that are campus-based, faculty-centered, and student-responsive. Faculty, students, and academic administrators are encouraged to work together in developing assessment programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

66072.

It is the intent of the Legislature to monitor the performance of the University of California, the California State University, and the community colleges in the following areas:

(a) Diversification of student bodies. 

(b) Improved student transfer rates. 

(c) Improved student retention rates. 

(d) Diversification of faculty, nonfaculty academic staff, and administrative positions.

(e) As a part of program review, enhanced student learning, as demonstrated through mechanisms designed to explore improvements in knowledge, skills, and abilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Designation of California Black-Serving Institutions [66076. - 66076.4.]

66076.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Designation of California Black-Serving Institutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 627, Sec. 2.   (SB 1348)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66076.1.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Applicant” means an eligible college or university that applies for a designation pursuant to this article.

(b) “College or university” means a University of California, California State University, or California Community Colleges campus, or an independent institution of higher education.

(c) “Governing board” means the governing board established pursuant to this article.

(d) “Managing entity” means the California State University Statewide Central Office for the Advancement of Black Excellence described in
 this article.

(e) “Normal time” means the time it would take a full-time student to complete the requirements for a degree or certificate offered by a college or university.

(f) “Recipient” means a college or university that receives a designation pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 627, Sec. 2.   (SB 1348)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66076.2.

(a) The Designation of California Black-Serving Institutions is hereby established to recognize colleges and universities that excel at providing academic resources to Black and African American students enrolled in degree or certificate programs offered by colleges and universities. This designation shall only be awarded to qualifying applicants by a two-thirds vote of approval by the governing board members who are present for the vote.

(b) An initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid for five academic years. Thereafter, a recipient may submit an application for renewal. A renewal designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid for five years.

(c) An applicant
 is eligible for designation pursuant to this article if the applicant meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Has at least 10 percent of the college’s or university’s enrolled student population identifying as Black and African American students, or has at least 1,500 Black and African American students enrolled at the college or university.

(2) Submits an initial or renewal application, as applicable, to the managing entity on or before the applicable application deadline established by the managing entity pursuant to Section 66076.3.

(3) Meets either of the following, as applicable:

(A) Submits an initial application that complies with subdivision (d).

(B) Submits a renewal
 application that complies with subdivision (e).

(4) Posts the initial or renewal application submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (3), as applicable, on the applicant’s internet website.

(d) An initial application shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A certification, in writing, by the chief administrative officer of the college or university, of the applicant’s commitment to address Black and African American student success that is consistent with the applicant’s mission.

(2) Academic goals for the applicant to achieve within the five-year period in which the initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid. The goals described in this paragraph shall improve retention, time-to-degree
 or time-to-certificate completion, and graduation rates of Black and African American students based on the data submitted by the applicant pursuant to paragraph (5) or (6), as applicable, within the five-year period in which the initial designation shall be valid.

(3) Academic equity goals for the applicant to achieve within the five-year period in which the initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid. The goals described in this paragraph shall reduce the academic equity gaps in the retention, time-to-degree or time-to-certificate completion, and graduation rates between the applicant’s Black and African American students and the overall student population based on data submitted by the applicant pursuant to paragraph (5) or (6), as applicable.

(4) A strategic plan for the five-year period in which the initial designation awarded pursuant to this article
 shall be valid on how the applicant intends to meet the academic goals and academic equity goals submitted pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3). The strategic plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) A mission statement that addresses the applicant’s commitment to serve Black and African American students.

(B) Outreach services to Black and African American students to encourage them to enroll at the college or university.

(C) Academic and basic needs support services to assist in the academic success of Black and African American students. Support services described in this subparagraph may include campus affinity centers and corequisite coursework or concurrent support activities.

(D) An outline of the planned allocation of
 resources during the five-year period in which the initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid, to ensure that the strategic plan described in this paragraph can be implemented.

(E) An outline of how the applicant will use existing resources to provide culturally-relevant professional development to the applicant’s faculty and staff.

(5) A four-year college or university applicant shall submit, in its application, graduation rates for the previous three academic years for all students, and for Black and African American students, within the normal time and up to 150 percent of the normal time to degree completion, yield, retention, and graduation rate.

(6) A community college applicant shall submit, in its application, all of the following for the previous three academic years:

(A) The number of degree and certificate programs completed by all students, and by Black and African American students.

(B) The number of all students, and of Black and African American students, who completed degree and certificate programs within normal time and up to 300 percent of normal time to degree completion, yield, retention, and graduation rate.

(C) The student transfer rates for all students, and for Black and African American students, to four-year colleges and universities.

(7) A description of campus resources to promote a campus of equity and inclusion for Black and African American students.

(e) A renewal application shall include, but not be limited to, all of the
 following:

(1) Either of the following, as applicable:

(A) An applicant seeking renewal upon expiration of an initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall resubmit the application it submitted to receive that initial designation.

(B) An applicant seeking renewal upon expiration of a renewal designation awarded pursuant this article shall resubmit the application it submitted to receive that previous renewal designation.

(2) Demonstration of the applicant’s progress to achieve the academic goals and academic equity goals provided in the application submitted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Demonstration of the applicant’s progress to implement the strategic plan provided in the
 application submitted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) Any changes made by the applicant to either of the following items provided in the application submitted pursuant to paragraph (1):

(A) The mission statement in the strategic plan that addresses the applicant’s commitment to serve Black and African American students.

(B) The description of campus resources to promote a campus of equity and inclusion for Black and African American students.

(5) A certification, in writing, by the chief administrative officer of the college or university, of the applicant’s continual commitment to address Black and African American student success that is consistent with the applicant’s mission.

(6) Academic goals for the applicant to achieve within the five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid. The goals described in this paragraph shall improve retention, time-to-degree or time-to-certificate completion, and graduation rates of Black and African American students based on the data submitted by the applicant pursuant to paragraph (9) or (10), as applicable, within the five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid.

(7) Academic equity goals for the applicant to achieve within the five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid. The goals described in this paragraph shall reduce the academic equity gaps in the retention, time-to-degree or time-to-certificate completion, and graduation rates between the applicant’s Black and African American students and the overall student population based on data submitted by the applicant pursuant to paragraph (9) or (10), as
 applicable.

(8) A strategic plan for the five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid on how the applicant intends to meet the academic goals and academic equity goals submitted pursuant to paragraphs (6) and (7). The strategic plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Outreach services to Black and African American students to encourage them to enroll at the college or university.

(B) Academic and basic needs support services to assist in the academic success of Black and African American students. Support services described in this subparagraph may include campus affinity centers and corequisite coursework or concurrent support activities.

(C) An outline of the planned allocation of resources for the
 five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid, to ensure that the strategic plan described in this paragraph can be implemented.

(D) An outline of how the applicant will use existing resources to provide culturally-relevant professional development to the applicant’s faculty and staff.

(9) A four-year college or university applicant shall submit, in its application, graduation rates for the previous five academic years for all students, and for Black and African American students, within the normal time and up to 150 percent of normal time to degree completion, yield, retention, and graduation rate.

(10) A community college campus shall submit, in its application, all of the following for the previous five academic years:

(A) The
 number of degree and certificate programs completed by all students, and by Black and African American students.

(B) The number of all students, and of Black and African American students, who completed degree and certificate programs within normal time and up to 300 percent of normal time to degree completion yield, retention, and graduation rate.

(C) The student transfer rates for all students, and for Black and African American students, to four-year colleges and universities.

(f) (1) If an applicant’s renewal application is denied by the governing board, the applicant may only submit an application to receive an initial designation pursuant to this article.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an applicant described in paragraph
 (1) may submit an application for a renewal designation following the award of a subsequent initial designation by the governing board pursuant to this article.

(g) An applicant is encouraged to inform and consult with the academic senate of the college or university on the applicant’s initial and renewal applications prepared pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 61.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66076.3.

The California State University Statewide Central Office for the Advancement of Black Excellence is hereby designated as the managing entity for initial and renewal designations pursuant to this article. The managing entity shall act as a neutral administrative body. The managing entity shall have all of the following duties:

(a) Developing application processes that contain the requirements described in Section 66076.2 for applicants.

(b) Accepting initial and renewal applications from applicants. The managing entity shall set two application deadlines each year on dates determined by the managing entity.

(c) Processing and presenting
 each application received to the governing board twice each year on dates determined by the governing board.

(d) Upon the governing board’s approval or denial of an applicant’s application, informing the applicant on this outcome.

(e) Preparing and delivering to an applicant approved by the governing board to receive a designation pursuant to this article, an appropriate insignia recognizing this designation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 627, Sec. 2.   (SB 1348)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66076.4.

(a) The governing board of the Designation of California Black-Serving Institutions is hereby established. The purpose of the governing board is to award colleges and universities with designations pursuant to this article based on applications presented by the managing entity pursuant to Section 66074.3.

(b) (1) The governing board shall be composed of all of the following eight members:

(A) The Lieutenant Governor, or the Lieutenant Governor’s designee.

(B) One member of the public, to be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(C) One member of the public, to be appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate.

(D) A designee of the President of the University of California.

(E) A designee of the Chancellor of the California State University.

(F) A designee of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(G) A designee of the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities.

(H) The chair of the California Legislative Black Caucus, or the chair’s designee.

(2) Any designee described in paragraph (1) shall be qualified to make decisions on behalf of that appointed position.

(3) A member of the public appointed pursuant to paragraph (1) by either the Speaker of the Assembly or the President pro Tempore of the Senate shall serve a two-year term.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that in appointing members of the public pursuant to paragraph (1), the appointing authority shall make every effort to ensure that the membership of the governing board includes persons who have a strong interest in the further development and improvement of the academic success of Black and African American students.

(c) For purposes of the first two years of the governing board’s operations, the chair of the governing board shall be the Lieutenant Governor or the Lieutenant Governor’s designee. The governing board shall select each subsequent chairman from within its membership by a vote of two-thirds of the
 governing board’s voting members.

(d) The governing board shall complete both of the following actions:

(1) Convene twice a year to vote on the approval or denial of applications.

(2) Approve or deny each application presented by the managing entity pursuant to Section 66074.3.

(e) All decisions made by the governing board shall require a two-thirds vote of approval by the governing board members who are present for the vote.

(f) The governing board shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 627, Sec. 2.   (SB 1348)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. English Proficiency in Higher Education [66080. - 66083.]

66080.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the “English Proficiency in Higher Education Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 200, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

66081.

“Instructional faculty,” for purposes of this article, means every member of an institution of public higher education, other than visiting faculty, but including graduate teaching assistants, who teach one or more undergraduate credit courses at a campus of that institution within this state except courses that are designed to be taught predominantly in a world language, and elective, special arrangement courses, such as individualized instruction and independent study courses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 29.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

66082.

(a) Each institution of public higher education shall evaluate its instructional faculty for oral and written proficiency in the English language in the classroom. In an institution where a majority of the students speak English, if a member of the instructional faculty is unable to demonstrate proficiency in oral or written communication, he or she shall be required to improve oral and written communication skills through courses, workshops, or programs specifically designed for this purpose.

(b) Each institution shall determine its own method or process of evaluating the language proficiency of its faculty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 200, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

66083.

This article does not apply to the California Community Colleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 200, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Standards and Guidelines for a Curriculum in Gerontology and Geriatrics in Higher Education [66085. - 66085.]

66085.

The Legislature requests that the Trustees of the California State University, the Regents of the University of California, and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, in consultation with the California Council on Gerontology and Geriatrics and other qualified groups or individuals, develop standards and guidelines, based on standards developed by the Association for Gerontology in Higher Education, for the biological, social, and psychological aspects of aging for professional degree programs at the associate, bachelor, and graduate levels, including those programs in gerontology, nursing, social work, psychology, marriage and family therapy, professional clinical counseling, and the rehabilitation therapies. Nothing in this article shall be
 construed to require any additional coursework requirements for professional degree programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 19.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. University Energy Efficiency Partnership [66090. - 66090.]

66090.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Investor-owned energy utilities” means the state’s three largest electrical corporations, as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code, and each gas corporation, as defined in Section 222 of the Public Utilities Code, of the state.

(2) “Local publicly owned energy utility” means a local publicly owned electric utility, as defined in Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code, or a local publicly owned gas utility.

(3) “Partnership” means the statewide
 institutional partnership between the California State University, the University of California, and investor-owned energy utilities.

(4) “University” means the University of California and the California State University.

(b) The Regents of the University of California are requested to, and the California State University shall,
 consider aligning their greenhouse gas reduction goals with those of the partnership and the state by doing all of the following:

(1) Expanding participation in the partnership to include the university facilities served by local publicly owned energy utilities that choose to participate, and seeking the assistance of the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission in requesting the participation of those local publicly owned energy
 utilities.

(2) Evaluating activities that reduce greenhouse gas emissions and improve energy efficiency based upon adherence to the Public Utilities Commission’s energy efficiency and savings protocols, if applicable,
 including, but not limited to, deep energy efficiency and eligible renewable energy resources, subject to applicable funding.

(3) Wherever feasible, utilizing
 whole-building, or whole-campus, meter-based verification.

(4) Developing an administrative framework that can be utilized by the partnership, to the extent allowable by the funding source, to allocate any future funding from the state or other sources for energy projects or projects for reducing greenhouse gas emissions.

(c) This section does not affect the eligibility of a university to receive resources from federal, state, and local government, or from public utilities or other sources through the partnership, and to leverage those resources.

(d) Funds associated with an investor-owned energy utility shall be used in compliance with Public Utilities Commission requirements at the
 university facilities within the service territory of the investor-owned energy utility.

(e) As a condition to participation in the expanded partnership, a university shall report to each investor-owned energy utility or local publicly owned energy utility the annual reduction in emissions of greenhouse gases from the expanded partnership at all university facilities within that utility’s service territory, by a mutually agreed upon date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 597, Sec. 2.   (AB 1150)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Access to Higher Education for Every Student [66093. - 66093.4.]

66093.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) California’s colleges and universities have traditionally been beacons of free thought that challenge students in a peaceful, safe environment. Its institutions of higher education have always been of great pride to the State of California.

 (2) With great risks presented by changes to immigration policies and enforcement at the federal level, it is more important than ever to work to protect the students, faculty, staff, and the public, and ensure that, regardless of their immigration status, they can continue to take advantage of the
 education to which they are entitled, and are free from intimidation or loss of access to resources and programs that other students enjoy.

(3) It is imperative that California put necessary protections in place, and show it will take the necessary steps to ensure that the state’s students, faculty, staff, and the public have every opportunity to continue their education without fear or undue risk.

(4) In doing so, California reaffirms the principles that the attainment of education for the betterment of the individual and the community is paramount, regardless of one’s immigration status. It is in the country’s best interests, as a nation of immigrants, which has benefited greatly from immigrants of all walks and backgrounds, to ensure that those who pursue educational and academic
 growth may further contribute to the productivity of this great state and nation.

(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to enact the policies set forth in Section 66093.3 to ensure that California’s public and private institutions of higher education strive to foster a campus community that is safe, welcoming for all, and provides access to services and supports for all students, faculty, and staff regardless of their immigration status.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 488, Sec. 1.   (AB 21)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

66093.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, “institution” means a California State University or a University of California campus.

(b) The Trustees of the California State University shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, in addition to complying with subdivision (j) of Section 66093.3, do
 all of the following:

(1) If an undocumented student is subject to immigration enforcement activity, ensure that the undocumented student’s inability to satisfy the student’s academic requirements at the institution due to immigration enforcement activity does not affect the student’s qualification for the exemption from paying nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5, provided the student meets the requirements described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 68130.5.

(2) Ensure that staff and the designated Dreamer Resource Liaison at the institution assist undocumented students in accessing all financial aid and academic resources available to undocumented students.

(3) Adopt a systemwide policy addressing course grades, administrative withdrawal, and reenrollment for undocumented students who are unable to attend their courses by the final drop date due to immigration enforcement activity. The systemwide policy shall include a timeframe during which a student withdrawn for nonattendance is reenrolled and retains the same academic status they held before their withdrawal, upon
 submitting written confirmation of their intent to return to the institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 668, Sec. 1.   (SB 307)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66093.3.

(a) The Trustees of the California State University, the governing board of each community college district in the state, and each independent institution of higher education that is a qualifying institution as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 69432.7, shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, do all of the following to the fullest extent consistent with state and federal law:

(1) Refrain from disclosing personal information about students, faculty, and staff except: (A) with the consent of the person identified, or if the person is under 18 years of age, with the consent of the
 parent or guardian of the person identified; (B) as may legally be disclosed under state and federal privacy laws; (C) for the programmatic purpose for which the information was obtained; (D) as part of a directory that does not include residence addresses or individual persons’ course schedules and that the person has not elected to opt out of; or (E) in response to a judicial warrant, court order, or subpoena.

(2) Advise all students, faculty, and staff to notify the office of the chancellor or president, or their designee, as soon as possible, if they are advised that an immigration
 officer is expected to enter, will enter, or has entered the campus to execute a federal immigration order.

(3) If there is reason to suspect that a student, faculty, or staff person has been taken into custody as a result of an immigration enforcement action, the college or university, as soon as possible, shall notify the person’s emergency contact that the person has been taken into custody.

(4) Comply with a request from an immigration officer for access to nonpublic areas of the campus only upon presentation of a judicial warrant. This paragraph shall not apply to an immigration officer’s request for access or information related to the operation of international student, staff, or faculty programs, employment verification efforts, or other nonenforcement activities.

(5) Advise all students, faculty, and staff responding to or having contact with an immigration officer executing a federal immigration order, to refer the entity or individual to the office of the chancellor or president, or their designee, for purposes of verifying the legality of any warrant, court order, or subpoena.

(6) Designate a staff person to serve as a point of contact for any student, faculty, or staff person who may or could be subject to an immigration order or inquiry on campus. Unless the disclosure is permitted by state and federal education privacy law, faculty and staff persons shall be prohibited from discussing the personal information, including immigration status information, of any student, faculty, or staff person with anyone, or revealing that personal
 information to anyone. This paragraph shall not be construed as requiring a college or university to hire staff to fulfill the requirements of this paragraph.

(7) Maintain a contact list of legal services providers who provide legal immigration representation, and provide it free of charge to any and all students who request it. The list shall include, but not be limited to, the organization’s name and contact number, email address, and office address.

(8) Adopt and implement, by March 1, 2019, the model policy developed by the Attorney General or an equivalent policy pursuant to the California Values Act (Chapter 17.25 (commencing with Section 7284) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), limiting assistance with immigration enforcement to the fullest extent possible
 consistent with federal and state law.

(9) (A) Post on its internet website in a conspicuous location, and provide via email quarterly or each semester to all students, faculty, and staff:

(i) A copy of the policy adopted pursuant to paragraph (8).

(ii) Guidance informing them of their rights under state and federal immigration laws and how to respond to a federal immigration action or order.

(B) Update the information posted on its internet website pursuant to subparagraph (A) as often as is necessary to reflect any changes to federal and state immigration laws and university or college policies and procedures.

(10) In the event that an undocumented student is subject to a federal immigration order, ensure that all of the following occur:

(A) In the event that an undocumented student is detained, deported, or is unable to attend to the student’s academic requirements due to the actions of an immigration officer in relation to a federal immigration order, the college or university shall make all reasonable efforts to assist the student in retaining any eligibility for financial aid, fellowship stipends, exemption from nonresident tuition fees, funding for research or other educational projects, housing stipends or services, or other benefits the student has been awarded or received, and permit the student to be reenrolled if and when the student is able to return to the college or university. It
 is the intent of the Legislature that, in implementing this paragraph, California colleges and universities make reasonable and good faith efforts to provide for a seamless transition in a student’s reenrollment and reacquisition of campus services and supports.

(B) That staff is available to assist, in a sensitive manner, undocumented students, and other students, faculty, and staff who may be subject to a federal immigration order or inquiry, or who may face similar issues, and whose education or employment is at risk because of federal immigration actions.

(C) (i) All students, faculty, staff, and campus community members who work on campus are notified when the presence of
 immigration enforcement is confirmed on campus.

(ii) A notice provided pursuant to clause (i) shall include all of the following:

(I) The date and time the immigration enforcement was confirmed.

(II) The location of the confirmed immigration enforcement.

(III) A hyperlink to additional resources, including the information posted on its internet website pursuant to paragraph (10).

(iii) A notice provided pursuant to clause (i) shall not include any personally identifiable information.

(b) (1) Each
 campus of the California Community Colleges, of the California State University, and of each independent institution of higher education that is a qualifying institution as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 69432.7 shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, notify all students, faculty, staff, and other campus community members who work on campus when the presence of immigration enforcement is confirmed on campus, to the fullest extent consistent with state and federal law.

(2) A notice provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include all of the following information:

(A) The date and time the immigration enforcement was confirmed.

(B) The location of the confirmed
 immigration enforcement.

(C) A hyperlink to additional resources, including the information posted on its internet website pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (a).

(3) A notice provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not include any personally identifiable information.

(c) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Immigration enforcement” includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law, and also includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a
 person’s presence in, entry, or reentry to, or employment in, the United States.

(2) “Immigration officer” means any state, local, or federal law enforcement officer who is seeking to enforce immigration law.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 124, Sec. 8.   (SB 98)   Effective September 20, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.\n   See later operative version added by Sec. 9 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 124.)
-------------------------------------------

66093.3.

The Trustees of the California State University, the governing board of each community college district in the state, and each independent institution of higher education that is a qualifying institution as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 69432.7, shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, do all of the following to the fullest extent consistent with state and federal law:

(a) Refrain from disclosing personal information about students, faculty, and staff except: (1) with the consent of the person identified, or if the person is under 18 years of age, with the consent of the parent or guardian of the person identified; (2) as may legally be
 disclosed under state and federal privacy laws; (3) for the programmatic purpose for which the information was obtained; (4) as part of a directory that does not include residence addresses or individual persons’ course schedules and that the person has not elected to opt out of; or (5) in response to a judicial warrant, court order, or subpoena.

(b) Advise all students, faculty, and staff to notify the office of the chancellor or president, or their designee, as soon as possible, if they are advised that an immigration officer is expected to enter, will enter, or has entered the campus to execute a federal immigration order.

(c) If there is reason to suspect that a student, faculty, or staff person has been taken into custody as a result of an immigration enforcement action, the
 college or university, as soon as possible, shall notify the person’s emergency contact that the person has been taken into custody.

(d) Comply with a request from an immigration officer for access to nonpublic areas of the campus only upon presentation of a judicial warrant. This subdivision shall not apply to an immigration officer’s request for access or information related to the operation of international student, staff, or faculty programs, employment verification efforts, or other nonenforcement activities.

(e) Advise all students, faculty, and staff responding to or having contact with an immigration officer executing a federal immigration order, to refer the entity or individual to the office of the chancellor or president, or their designee, for purposes of verifying
 the legality of any warrant, court order, or subpoena.

(f) Designate a staff person to serve as a point of contact for any student, faculty, or staff person who may or could be subject to an immigration order or inquiry on campus. Unless the disclosure is permitted by state and federal education privacy law, faculty and staff persons shall be prohibited from discussing the personal information, including immigration status information, of any student, faculty, or staff person with anyone, or revealing that personal information to anyone. This subdivision shall not be construed as requiring a college or university to hire staff to fulfill the requirements of this subdivision.

(g) Maintain a contact list of legal services providers who provide legal immigration representation, and provide
 it free of charge to any and all students who request it. The list shall include, but not be limited to, the organization’s name and contact number, email address, and office address.

(h) Adopt and implement, by March 1, 2019, the model policy developed by the Attorney General or an equivalent policy pursuant to the California Values Act (Chapter 17.25 (commencing with Section 7284) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), limiting assistance with immigration enforcement to the fullest extent possible consistent with federal and state law.

(i) (1) Post on its internet website in a conspicuous location, and provide via email quarterly or each semester to all students, faculty, and staff:

(A) A copy of the policy adopted pursuant to subdivision (h).

(B) Guidance informing them of their rights under state and federal immigration laws and how to respond to a federal immigration action or order.

(2) Update the information posted on its internet website pursuant to paragraph (1) as often as is necessary to reflect any changes to federal and state immigration laws and university or college policies and procedures.

(j) In the event that an undocumented student is subject to a federal immigration order, ensure that both of the following occur:
